Washington statutes.
RCW 19.40.091

Extinguishment of claim for relief.

A claim for relief with respect to a transfer or obligation under this chapter is extinguished unless action is brought:

(1) Under RCW 19.40.041(1)(a), not later than four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, not later than one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

(2) Under RCW 19.40.041(1)(b) or 19.40.051(1), not later than four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

(3) Under RCW 19.40.051(2), not later than one year after the transfer was made.

[ 2017 c 57 s 9; 1987 c 444 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 444: See note following RCW 19.40.011.